North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 2. Procedure for Issuing Bonds.
§ 159-65.
Resolution fixing the details of the bonds.

After the bond order has been adopted, the board shall adopt a resolution fixing the details of the bonds. In fixing details of the bonds, the board is subject to these restrictions and directions:

The dates for payment of installments of principal shall not exceed the maximum periods of usefulness prescribed by the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 159-122

.

Bonds authorized by two or more bond orders may be consolidated into a single issue.

Bonds of each issue shall have principal paid in annual installments, the first of which shall be payable not more than three years after the date of the bonds, and the last within the maximum maturity period prescribed by regulation of the Commission under

G.S. 159-122

.

No installment of principal for any issue may be more than four times as great in amount as the smallest prior installment of principal for the same issue.

Bonds of each issue may be issued from time to time in series with different provisions for each series. Each series shall be deemed a separate issue for the purposes of this section, except that two or more series may be considered to be a single issue under subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection if issued on the same day or two consecutive days.

Any bond may be made payable on demand or tender for purchase as provided in

G.S. 159-79

, and any bond may be made subject to redemption prior to maturity, with or without premium, on such notice and at such time or times and with such redemption provisions as may be stated therein. When any such bond has been validly called for redemption and provision has been made for the payment of the principal thereof, any redemption premium, and the interest thereon accrued to the date of redemption, interest thereon shall cease.

The bonds may bear interest at such rate or rates, payable semiannually or otherwise, may be in such denominations, and may be made payable in such kind of money and in such place or places within or without the State of North Carolina, as the board may determine.

Subdivisions (a)(3) and (4) of this section do not apply to refunding bonds or to bonds purchased by a State or federal agency. Subdivisions (a)(3) and (4) also do not apply to bonds the interest on which is or may be includable in gross income for purposes of federal income tax, as long as the dates for payment of principal on these bonds have been approved by the Commission. For the purposes of subdivisions (a)(3) and (4) of this section and for bonds the interest on which is or may be includable in gross income for purposes of federal income tax, payment of an installment of principal may be provided for by the maturity of a bond, mandatory redemption of principal prior to maturity, a sinking fund, a credit facility as defined in

G.S. 159-79

, or any other means satisfactory to the Commission.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 25; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(25); C.S., s. 2951; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1933, c. 259, s. 1; 1951, c. 440, s. 1; 1953, c. 1206, s. 3; 1969, c. 686; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 10; cc. 883, 995; 1987, c. 585, s. 2; c. 586; 2003-388, s. 2.

§ 159-66.
Validation of former proceedings and actions.

All proceedings and actions heretofore taken by the governing boards of units of local government and by the Local Government Commission to fix the details of bonds and to provide for the advertisement and sale thereof are hereby ratified, approved, confirmed and in all respects validated, notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 159-65(4).

This section shall apply to all bonds sold by the Local Government Commission between July 1, 1973, and February 18, 1974.

History.

1973, c. 872, ss. 1, 2.

§ 159-67.
Procedures if a county votes to relocate the county seat.

Whenever the citizens of a county, by referendum, decide that the county’s county seat, along with the courthouse and other county buildings and agencies, should be relocated, the board of county commissioners of that county shall forthwith begin discussions with the Local Government Commission concerning financing of the relocation. If bonds are to be issued for the relocation, or a financing agreement entered into, the board of commissioners shall apply to the Local Government Commission no later than 10 months after the day of the referendum. If a bond election is necessary, it shall be held no later than 22 months after the day of the referendum.

History.

1975, c. 324, s. 5.

§ 159-68.
Certain provisions not applicable to refunding bonds.

The provisions of

G.S. 159-56

and the provisions of this Article related to the holding of a public hearing prior to the adoption of the bond order do not apply to refunding bonds issued by a unit of local government so long as the refunding bonds do not extend the final maturity of the debt or obligation to be refunded and so long as the aggregate debt service over the life of the refunding bonds is less than the aggregate debt service on the debt or obligation to be refunded. When the conditions of this section are satisfied, a unit of local government may introduce a bond order, adopt a bond order, and adopt a sale resolution with respect to refunding bonds in one or more meetings of the unit’s governing body.

History.

2005-238, s. 3.

§§ 159-69 through 159-71.

Reserved for future codification purposes.